District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.58

Repealed

Notice of cancellation or termination of certified policy.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 135, ch. 222, § 58
Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 86, Pub. L. 86-730, § 6
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-458.
1973 Ed., § 40-474.